Florida, session 2026, HB627.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (10) is added to section 119.07,
Florida Statutes, to read:
119.07 Inspection and copying of records; photographing
public records; fees; exemptions.—
(10)(a) A law enforcement officer, as defined in s.
943.10(1), who is actively engaged in the performance of an
official duty, including, but not limited to, a call for
service, an investigation, a case-related activity, or any other
official law enforcement activity, may decline to accept or
process a public records request at such time.
(b) The determination of whether an officer is actively
engaged in the performance of an official duty under this
subsection shall be made by the officer. Upon such
determination, the officer must verbally inform the requestor
that he or she cannot accept or process the request and must
direct the requestor to:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb627-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 627 2026
1. The custodian of records for the officer's employing
agency; or
2. An official public records request portal, if
available.
(c) A person who, after being informed as required under
paragraph (b), knowingly and willfully persists in attempting to
compel an officer to accept or process a public records request
while the officer is actively engaged in the performance of an
official duty commits the offense of resisting an officer
without violence in violation of s. 843.02.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb627-01-c1